Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.17 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Media literacy and cybersecurity education shall be taught
in the public schools of this state. Media literacy and
cybersecurity education shall include, but is not limited to, the
following areas of instruction:
1. Identifying and avoiding online scams such as: phishing,
catfishing, malware, ransomware, scareware, and clickbait;
Req. No. 11168 Page 1

2. Identifying fraudulent emails, websites, and social media
profiles;
3. Using passwords and online security;
4. Protecting personal information;
5. Identifying fake news, including how to find sources to
verify information; and
6. Identifying deepfake images, videos, and audio and
identifying artificial intelligence (AI).
B. Beginning with students entering the sixth grade in the
2027-2028 school year, students shall fulfill the requirement by
satisfactorily completing a media literacy and cybersecurity course
containing the areas of instruction as provided in subsection A of
this section during the sixth, seventh, or eighth grade.
C. Media literacy and cybersecurity instruction shall be
provided in a one-half (1/2) unit course.
D. For students who transfer into an Oklahoma school district
from out of state during or after the eighth grade, school districts
may make an exception to the requirements for a media literacy and
cybersecurity course pursuant to the provisions of Section 11-103.6
of this title. School districts shall still encourage completion of
instruction in media literacy and cybersecurity.
E. The State Board of Education shall identify and adopt
curriculum standards for media literacy and cybersecurity
instruction that reflect the areas of instruction listed in
Req. No. 11168 Page 2

subs ection A of this section. The standards shall be incorporated
into the state academic content standards adopted by the Board
pursuant to Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
F. The State Department of Education shall:
1. Develop guidelines and material designed to enable schools
to offer media literacy and cybersecurity as a separate course. The
guidelines shall outline the areas of instruction to be taught based
on the curriculum standards adopted by the Board;
2. Develop professional development programs that are designed
to help teachers provide instruction in media literacy and
cybersecurity. Development programs shall be designed to help
teachers provide instruction through a separate media literacy and
cybersecurity course;
3. Provide resources to assist schools in developing a separate
media literacy and cybersecurity course; and
4. Provide and identify resources designed to enable students
identified as English language learners and students with specific
learning disabilities or individual educational needs to understand
and use the media literacy and cybersecurity information presented.
G. Within thirty (30) days of completing the media literacy and
cybersecurity curriculum standards, the State Board of Education
shall submit to the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives
and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate a report
outlining the standards.
Req. No. 11168 Page 3

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11168 SW 01/16/25





















Req. No. 11168 Page 4